District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.111

Scope of practice for land surveyors.

For the purposes of this part, the term “practice of land surveying” means providing professional services including consultation, investigation, testimony evaluation, expert technical testimony, planning, mapping, assembling and interpreting reliable scientific measurements and information relative to the location, size, shape or physical features of the earth, improvements on the earth, the space above the earth, or any part of the earth, and utilization and development of these facts and interpretation into an orderly survey map, plan, report, description, or project.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.111.